src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_6c_ё_трепа́ть
+V+Perf+IV:епа́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́п Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́п PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:епа́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́п Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́п PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёпа PastPass_нн_stem ; 

LEXICON св_6c_ё_еса́ть
+V+Perf+IV:еса́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́с Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:еса́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́с Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёса PastPass_нн_stem ; 

LEXICON св_6c_ё_ета́ть
+V+Perf+IV:ета́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́т Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ета́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́т Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёта PastPass_нн_stem ; 

LEXICON св_6c_ё_епта́ть
+V+Perf+IV:епта́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́пт Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:епта́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́пт Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёпта PastPass_нн_stem ; 

LEXICON св_6c_ё_еста́ть
+V+Perf+IV:еста́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́ст Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:еста́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ст Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёста PastPass_нн_stem ; 

LEXICON св_6c_ё_еха́ть
+V+Perf+IV:еха́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́х Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:еха́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́х Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёха PastPass_нн_stem ; 

!- - - - - - - Stem type 6 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_6a_ать_Lxc
св_6a?_ать_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6a_ять_Lxc
св_6a?_ять_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6c_ё_трепа́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:епа́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́п Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́п PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:епа́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́п Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́п PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёпа PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ; 

LEXICON св_6c_а́ть_Lxc
св_6c?_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6°b/c_а́ть_(е)рать_Lxc
св_нп_6°b/c_а́ть_(е)рать_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ра́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ер Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ра PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6°b/c_а́ть_(о)вать_Lxc ! назвать, etc.
+V+Perf+IV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:ов Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ов Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6°b/c_а́ть_Lxc
св_6°b/c?_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_6a?_ать_Lxc
св_нп_6a_ать_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_ать_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a?_ять_Lxc
св_нп_6a_ять_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_ять_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_6c?_а́ть_Lxc
св_нп_6c_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;

LEXICON св_нп_6c_а́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_shift ;

LEXICON св_нп_6°b/c_а́ть_(е)рать_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:ра́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_6°b/c?_а́ть_Lxc
св_нп_6°b/c_а́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_6°b/c_а́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

!====================================== Stem type 7 ======================================
!                                    зти, зть, сти, сть
! Some 7 verbs have present passive ppl

LEXICON нсв_нп_7a
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a3_ти
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem3 ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a[3]
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem[3] ;

LEXICON св_7a
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-д-)
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-д-)_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-д-)9_ти
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_V_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_V_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_7a9_ти
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-д-)9_ти_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_stem9_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a_(-д-)
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_Impи ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a_(-д-)_сесть
+V+Perf+IV:е́д Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:я́д Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a_(-д-)_R_сесть
+V+Perf+IV:е́д Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:я́д Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-с-)9_ти
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_stem9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_7a_(-с-)9_ти_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_stem9_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_7a_(-ст-)_прош._вы/рос,_-ла,_-ший
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:асти́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ос Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ос Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+IV:ос PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:аст Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_7b
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_7b_(-д-)
нсв_7b_(-д-)? ;

LEXICON нсв_7b_(-д-)?
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b_(-д-)_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_7b_(-д-)8
нсв_7b_(-д-)? ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_7b !-зти verbs, with twolc, should be treated same as д
св_7b_(-д-) ;

LEXICON св_7b_R
св_7b_(-д-)_R ;

LEXICON св_7b_(-д-)
св_нп_7b_(-д-) ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_7b_(-д-)_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b_(-д-)
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_7b/b
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-б-)_ё
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-б-)_ё_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_ё
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-д-)
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-с-)
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_ё
+V+Impf+IV:ёс Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:ес Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_ё_R
+V+Impf+IV:ёс Impf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:ес Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-д-)_ё_вести
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёд Past_end ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:ед PresFut_1_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:ед Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Impf+IV:ед PresVrbAdv_end ; 
+V+Impf+IV:ед%<у́ PresAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́%^d Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Impf+TV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Impf+TV:ёд Past_end ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:ед PresFut_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV:ед Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Impf+TV:ед PresVrbAdv_end ; 
+V+Impf+TV:ед%<у́ PresAct ;
+V+Impf+TV:е́%^d Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Impf+TV:е́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Impf+TV+Inf+Pass:ести́сь # ;
+V+Impf+TV:ёд Past_end_Pass ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:ед PresFut_1_end_Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:ед%<у́ PresAct_Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:е́%^d PastAct_Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-д-)_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:ести́сь # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ё%^d Past_end_R_безл. ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:ед PresFut_1_end_R_безл. ;
