src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
грызть:гры́з нсв_7b "weight: 2.3185185748958412" ;
красть:кра́д нсв_7b_(-д-) "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
красться:кра́д нсв_7b_(-д-)_R "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
прясть:пря́д нсв_7b_(-д-)8 ;
класть:кла́д нсв_7b_(-д-)? "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
грызться:гры́з нсв_7b_R ;
грести:грёб нсв_7b/b_(-б-)_ё ;
скрести:скрёб нсв_7b/b_(-б-)_ё "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
скрестись:скрёб нсв_7b/b_(-б-)_ё_R ;
блюсти:блю́%^d нсв_7b/b_(-д-) "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
вестись:в нсв_7b/b_(-д-)_R_безл. "weight: 3.0061338283547383" ;
вести:в нсв_7b/b_(-д-)_ё_вести "weight: 4.482871430680278" ;
трясти:тря́с нсв_7b/b_(-с-) "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
пастись:па́с нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_R "weight: 2.5173529610900824" ;
трястись:тря́с нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_R "weight: 3.4346119042762373" ;
пасти:па́с нсв_7b/b_(-с-) ; ! имеется_прич._страд._наст._(устар.)_пасо/ "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
нестись:н нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_ё_R "weight: 3.3240865291347834" ;
нести:н нсв_7b/b_(-с-)_ё "weight: 3.92127847690213" ; ! имеется_прич._страд._наст._(устар.)_несо/мый
везти:вёз нсв_7b/b_ё "weight: 2.6053081314452124" ; ! имеется_прич._страд._наст._(устар.)_везо/мый
лезть:ле́з нсв_нп_7a "weight: 2.439940737781304" ;
ползти:по́лз нсв_нп_7b/b "weight: 3.147303167172623" ;
истрепать:истр св_6c_ё_трепа́ть "weight: 2.4069404776783787" ;
подтрепать:подтр св_6c_ё_трепа́ть ;
потрепать:потр св_6c_ё_трепа́ть "weight: 3.593569728173968" ;
нашептать:наш св_6c_ё_епта́ть "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
пошептать:пош св_6c_ё_епта́ть ;
потесать:пот св_6c_ё_еса́ть ;
начесать:нач св_6c_ё_еса́ть "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
похлестать:похл св_6c_ё_еста́ть ;
отхлестать:отхл св_6c_ё_еста́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
разметать:разм св_6c_ё_ета́ть "weight: 2.1695795618837748" ;
пометать:пом св_6c_ё_ета́ть ;
уметать:ум св_6c_ё_ета́ть ;
понабрехать:понабр св_6c_ё_еха́ть ;
сбрехать:сбр св_6c_ё_еха́ть ;
выгрызть:в%^Yгрыз св_7a ;
выкрасть:в%^Yкрад св_7a_(-д-) "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
выпрясть:в%^Yпряд св_7a_(-д-) ;
выкрасться:в%^Yкрад св_7a_(-д-)_R ;
рассесться:расс св_нп_7a_(-д-)_R_сесть "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
усесться:ус св_нп_7a_(-д-)_R_сесть ;
вывести:в%^Yве%^d св_7a_(-д-)9_ти "weight: 4.02000299625041" ;
повывести:пов%^Yве%^d св_7a_(-д-)9_ти ;
вывестись:в%^Yвед св_7a_(-д-)9_ти_R ;
вынести:в%^Yнес св_7a_(-с-)9_ти "weight: 3.9648274182983236" ;
вынестись:в%^Yнес св_7a_(-с-)9_ти_R ;
вывезти:в%^Yвез св_7a9_ти "weight: 3.5423242389100267" ;
подгрызть:подгры́з св_7b ;
огрызть:огры́з св_7b "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
скрасть:скра́д св_7b_(-д-) "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
впрясть:впря́д св_7b_(-д-) ;
вкрасться:вкра́д св_7b_(-д-)_R ;
испрясться:испря́д св_7b_(-д-)_R ;
перегрызться:перегры́з св_7b_R ;
прогрызться:прогры́з св_7b_R ;
влезть:вле́з св_нп_7a ;
долезть:доле́з св_нп_7a ;
выпасть:в%^Yпад св_нп_7a_(-д-) "weight: 3.5047638337820617" ;
повыпасть:пов%^Yпад св_нп_7a_(-д-) ;
засесть:зас св_нп_7a_(-д-)_сесть "weight: 2.944428176717333" ;
присесть:прис св_нп_7a_(-д-)_сесть "weight: 2.274314912403788" ;
вырасти:в%^Yр св_нп_7a_(-ст-)_прош._вы/рос,_-ла,_-ший "weight: 3.7770345850984435" ;
подвырасти:подв%^Yр св_нп_7a_(-ст-)_прош._вы/рос,_-ла,_-ший ;
вылезти:вы́лез св_нп_7a3_ти "weight: 2.7022181444532687" ;
вылезть:вы́лез св_нп_7a[3] "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
опасть:опа́д св_нп_7b_(-д-) "weight: 3.350903347873133" ;
упасть:упа́д св_нп_7b_(-д-) "weight: 3.7181364780512576" ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
заплакать:запла́к св_6a_ать_Lxc "weight: 2.7409707334452853" ;
рассеять:рассе́ св_6a_ять_Lxc "weight: 3.463644777414934" ;
обязать:обя́з св_6c_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 4.182991376946505" ;
связать:свя́з св_6c_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 5.200308048177458" ;
растрепать:растр св_6c_ё_трепа́ть_Lxc "weight: 3.534727057159505" ;
потрепать:потр св_6c_ё_трепа́ть_Lxc "weight: 3.593569728173968" ;
оборвать:обо́рв св_6°b/c_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 3.1888847170791617" ;
избрать:и́зб св_6°b/c_а́ть_(е)рать_Lxc "weight: 4.342235556137491" ;
собрать:со́б св_6°b/c_а́ть_(е)рать_Lxc "weight: 4.4881171728376525" ;
призвать:при́з св_6°b/c_а́ть_(о)вать_Lxc "weight: 4.204827320395892" ;
